Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2048YH (3) 91 jm/md H.F. 262 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 257.13A Teacher minimum salary 1 budget adjustment. 2 1. For the school budget year beginning July 1, 2025, and 3 succeeding budget years, if a school districtâs actual cost to 4 comply with the applicable minimum teacher salary requirements 5 under chapter 284 of the school district for the budget 6 year, including costs associated with the employerâs share of 7 contributions to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system 8 and the employerâs share of the tax imposed by the federal 9 Insurance Contributions Act, is greater than the amount of the 10 school districtâs total teacher salary supplement district cost 11 under section 257.10, subsection 9, for the budget year, the 12 district shall be eligible to receive a teacher minimum salary 13 budget adjustment. The budget adjustment shall be limited to 14 the additional amount necessary to comply with the teacher 15 minimum salaries of the school districtâs teacher leadership 16 positions prior to the application of additional contracted pay 17 for teacher leadership roles pursuant to a district teacher 18 leadership and compensation framework under chapter 284, 19 contracted full-time teachers, part-time teachers with minimum 20 salaries prorated to contracted time, and qualified nurses, 21 counselors, and librarians, plus the amount necessary to comply 22 with the school districtâs teacher salary schedule for such 23 teachers under a teacher salary contract in order to prevent 24 salary compaction resulting from negotiated terms in a teacher 25 contract for the school budget year beginning July 1, 2023. 26 2. The board of directors of a school district that wishes 27 to receive a teacher minimum salary budget adjustment shall 28 adopt a resolution to receive the adjustment and notify the 29 school budget review committee annually, but not earlier than 30 November 1, as determined by the department of education. The 31 school budget review committee shall establish a modified 32 supplemental amount pursuant to subsection 1. 33 3. Pursuant to section 257.31, subsection 5, the 34 supplemental amount generated by the budget adjustment pursuant 35 -1- LSB 2048YH (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 2 H.F. 262 to this section shall be considered miscellaneous income and 1 shall not be included in district cost. The supplemental 2 amount must be expended by the district in the year granted 3 and is restricted to expenditures for minimum teacher salary 4 purposes. 5 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 6 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 7